Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.9657, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Hospital surcharge. (a) Effective October 1, 1992, each Minnesota hospital except facilities of the federal Indian Health Service and regional treatment centers shall pay to the medical assistance account a surcharge equal to 1.4 percent of net patient revenues excluding net Medicare revenues reported by that provider to the health care cost information system according to the schedule in subdivision 4. (b) Effective July 1, 1994, the surcharge under paragraph (a) is increased to 1.56 percent. new text begin (c) Effective July 1, 2026, the surcharge under paragraph (a) must not be imposed. This paragraph expires July 1, 2027. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Notwithstanding the Medicare cost finding and allowable cost principles, the hospital surcharge is not an allowable cost for purposes of rate setting under sections 256.9685 to 256.9695. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end